Montana, session 2025, HB770.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:
Section 1. Section 13-37-226, MCA, is amended to read:
"13-37-226. Time for filing reports. (1) Except as provided in 13-37-206 and 13-37-225(3), a
candidate shall file reports required by 13-37-225(1)(a), even if the candidate has no contributions or
expenditures to report, containing the information required by 13-37-229, 13-37-231, and 13-37-232 as follows:
(a) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning with the calendar quarter
in which funds are received or expended during the year or years prior to the election year that the candidate
expects to be on the ballot and ending in the final quarter of the year preceding the year of an election in which
the candidate participates;
(b) except as provided in subsection (4)(a), the 20th day of March, April, May, June, August,
September, October, and November in the year of an election in which the candidate participates;
(c) except as provided in subsection (6), within 2 business days of receiving a contribution equal to
the applicable limitation provided in 13-37-216 for the candidate if the contribution is received between the 15th
day of the month preceding an election in which the candidate participates and the day before the election;
(d) except as provided in subsection (6), within 2 business days of making an expenditure of an
amount equal to or more than the applicable contribution limitation provided in 13-37-216 for the candidate if
made between the 15th day of the month preceding an election in which the candidate participates and the day
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 770
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 770
before the election;
(e) semiannually on the 10th day of March and September, starting in the year following an
election in which the candidate participates until the candidate files a closing report as specified in 13-37-
228(3); and
(f) as provided by subsection (3).
(2) Except as provided in 13-37-206, 13-37-225(3), and 13-37-227, a political committee or a joint
fundraising committee shall file reports required by 13-37-225(1)(a) containing the information required by 13-
37-229, 13-37-231, and 13-37-232 as follows:
(a) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning with the calendar quarter
in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee receives a contribution or makes an
expenditure after an individual becomes a candidate or an issue becomes a ballot issue, as defined in 13-1-
101(6)(b), and ending in the final quarter of the year preceding the year in which the candidate or the ballot
issue appears on the ballot;
(b) except as provided in subsection (4)(b), the 30th day of March, April, May, June, August,
September, October, and November in the year of an election in which the political committee or the joint
fundraising committee participates;
(c) within 2 business days of receiving a contribution, except as provided in 13-37-232, of $500 or
more if received between the 25th day of the month before an election in which the political committee or the
joint fundraising committee participates and the day before the election;
(d) within 2 business days of making an expenditure of $500 or more that is made between the
25th day of the month before an election in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee
participates and the day before the election;
(e) quarterly, due on the 5th day following a calendar quarter, beginning in the calendar quarter
following a year of an election in which the political committee or the joint fundraising committee participates
until the political committee or the joint fundraising committee files a closing report as specified in 13-37-228(3);
and
(f) as provided by subsection (3).
(3) In addition to the reports required by subsections (1), (2), and (4), if a candidate, political
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – HB 770
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 770
committee, or joint fundraising committee participates in a special election, the candidate, political committee,
or joint fundraising committee shall file reports as follows:
(a) a report on the 60th, 35th, and 12th days preceding the date of the special election; and
(b) 20 days after the special election.
(4) (a) A candidate for a municipal office who participates in an election held in an odd-numbered
year shall file the reports required in subsection (1) on the 20th day of June, July, August, September, October,
and November of the year of the election in which the candidate participates.
(b) A political committee that participates in a municipal election held in an odd-numbered year
shall file the reports required in subsection (2) on the 30th day of June, July, August, September, October, and
November of the year of the election in which the committee participates.
(5) Except as provided by 13-37-206, candidates for a local office and political committees that
receive contributions or make expenditures referencing a particular local issue or a local candidate shall file the
reports specified in subsections (1) through (4) only if the total amount of contributions received or the total
amount of funds expended for all elections in a campaign exceeds $500.
(6) A candidate is not required to file a report required by subsection (1)(c) or (1)(d) if the
candidate is not opposed in the election.
(7) A report required by this section must cover contributions received and expenditures made
pursuant to the time periods specified in 13-37-228.
(8) A report required by this section is due by 11:59 p.m. on the due date.
(9) A political committee may file a closing report prior to the date in 13-37-228(3) and after the
complete termination of its contribution and expenditure activity during an election cycle.
(10) Failure to comply with reporting requirements under this section will result in a candidate's
name not appearing on the official ballot for an election as provided in 13-37-126.
(10)(11)For the purposes of this section:
(a) a candidate participates in an election by attempting to secure nomination or election to an
office that appears on the ballot; and
(b) a political committee or a joint fundraising committee participates in an election by receiving a
contribution or making an expenditure."
- 3 - Authorized Print Version – HB 770
ENROLLED BILL

****
69th Legislature 2025 HB 770
- END -
- 4 - Authorized Print Version – HB 770
ENROLLED BILL

I hereby certify that the within bill,
HB 770, originated in the House.
___________________________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
___________________________________________
Speaker of the House
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.
___________________________________________
President of the Senate
Signed this _______________________________day
of____________________________________, 2025.

HOUSE BILL NO. 770
INTRODUCED BY J. ETCHART, F. NAVE, G. KMETZ
AN ACT REVISING CAMPAIGN FINANCE REPORTING REQUIREMENTS AND CONSEQUENCES FOR
FAILURE TO FILE; CLARIFYING THAT CANDIDATES SHALL FILE REPORTS EVEN IF NO CONTRIBUTIONS
OR EXPENDITURES WERE MADE; CLARIFYING THAT FAILURE TO REPORT RESULTS IN REMOVAL
FROM THE BALLOT IN AN ELECTION; AND AMENDING SECTION 13-37-226, MCA.”